Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-410 Violation of other laws.
No act done, action taken, or agreement made pursuant to the authority
conferred by this part shall constitute a violation of or grounds for
prosecution or civil proceedings under any other law of this State which does
not specifically refer to insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next